Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB746.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 77.070 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In a county containing a consolidated local government or a city with a population
equal to or greater than twenty thousand (20,000) based upon the most recent
federal decennial census, the air pollution control board of the air pollution control
district shall consist of seven (7) members, three (3) of whom shall be appointed by
the county judge/executive, subject to the approval of the fiscal court, and four (4)
of whom shall be appointed by the mayor. The mayoral appointments shall be
subject to the approval of the legislative body of the city.
(2) The mayor shall appoint, subject to the approval of the legislative body of the city,
one (1) member for a term of one (1) year, one (1) member for a term of two (2)
years, one (1) member for a term of three (3) years, and one (1) member for a term
of four (4) years, and the county judge/executive, subject to the approval of the
fiscal court, shall appoint one (1) member for a term of two (2) years, one (1)
member for a term of three (3) years, and one (1) member for a term of four (4)
years, and upon the expiration of each of said terms respectively, and thereafter, the
term of each of such members shall be four (4) years, and until their successors are
appointed and qualified.
(3) All air pollution control board members appointed pursuant to this section must be
freeholders within the district; those appointed by the county judge/executive must
be residents of such county, and those appointed by a mayor must be residents of
their respective city or consolidated local government.
(4) Not more than four (4) of the seven (7) board members appointed pursuant to this
section shall be of the same political party affiliation, nor shall an officer or
employee of such city, consolidated local government, or county, whether holding a
paid or unpaid position, be eligible for appointment to the board.
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 2/14/2025 9:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1799
(5) A member of the air pollution control board is eligible to succeed himself or
herself. A vacancy in the membership shall be filled by an appointee of the mayor
or of the county judge/executive as the case may be, for the unexpired portion of the
term. An appointee to a vacancy shall have the same qualifications as any regularly
appointed member.
(6) Any member of the board appointed by a mayor may be removed, for cause, after a
hearing, by the legislative body of such city or consolidated local government, and
after ten (10) days' notice in writing shall have been given to the member, which
notice shall embrace the charges preferred against him or her. At the hearing he or
she may be represented by counsel. The finding of the legislative body shall be
final and removal results in vacancy in such office.
(7) Any member of the board appointed by a county judge/executive may be removed,
for cause, after a hearing, by the fiscal court of such county, and after ten (10) days'
notice in writing shall have been given to the member, which notice shall embrace
the charges preferred against him or her. At the hearing he or she may be
represented by counsel. The finding of the fiscal court shall be final and removal
results in vacancy in such office.
(8) As used in this section "mayor" means the chief executive of the city or
consolidated local government whether the official designation of his or her office
is mayor, city manager, or otherwise.
(9) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, when a city of the first class
and a county containing such city have in effect a compact under KRS 79.310 to
79.330, the air pollution control board shall consist of seven (7) members, four (4)
of whom shall be appointed by the county judge/executive with the approval of the
fiscal court and three (3) of whom shall be appointed by the mayor, with the
approval of the legislative body, of the first-class city within such county. The
terms of such members shall be three (3) years, and until their successors are
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 2/14/2025 9:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1799
appointed and qualified. Upon the effective date of the compact, the mayor, and
county judge/executive with the approval of the fiscal court, shall adjust the terms
of the sitting members so that the term of one (1) of each of their appointments
expires in one (1) year, the term of one (1) of each of their appointments expires in
two (2) years, and the term of one (1) of each of their appointments expires in three
(3) years. The term of the then remaining member who was previously appointed by
the mayor shall terminate immediately and the county judge/executive with
approval of the fiscal court shall appoint a member for a one (1) year term. Upon
the expiration of these staggered terms, successors shall be appointed for a term of
three (3) years. Upon the establishment of a consolidated local government in a
county where a city of the first class and a county containing that city have had in
effect a cooperative compact pursuant to KRS 79.310 to 79.330, all members of the
board shall be appointed by the mayor of the consolidated local government
pursuant to the provisions of KRS 67C.139 for a term of three (3) years. Incumbent
members upon the establishment of the consolidated local government shall
continue to serve as members of the board for the time remaining of their current
term of appointment.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 2/14/2025 9:20 AM Jacketed